Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1133
Department; additional procedures; rules and regulations.

The department, with the recommendation of the board, may, by rule and regulation, prescribe functions, procedures, and services in addition to those in section 38-1131 which may be performed by a licensed dental hygienist under the supervision of a licensed dentist when such additional procedures are educational or related to the oral prophylaxis and intended to attain or maintain optimal oral health.

Laws 1986, LB 572, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 417;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-193.19;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 330;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 466.